lexc/verb/enhuigebik.lexc
LEXICON Caseoe
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^§igea§n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^§igea§n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^§igea§ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^§igea§n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^§igea§n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^§igea§ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^§igea§ni  #;
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^ik           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^§igeo§t§igeo§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^§igea§n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
!+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^§igeo§tt§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igeo§tt      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^§igeo§tt§igea§t§igeoe§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^§igeo§tt§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^§igeo§tt§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^§igeo§tt§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^§igeo§tt§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^§igeo§tt§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^§igeo§tt§igeaa§t§igeoe§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^§igeo§tt§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^§igea§nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^§igea§n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^§igea§n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^§igea§n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^§igea§n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^§igea§n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^§igea§n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^§igea§n§igeaa§t§igeoe§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^§igea§n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
!+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^§igeo§tt§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^§igea§n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né

! áramol
LEXICON AddVerb3
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep3;

LEXICON Rep3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper3;
                    Imper4;

LEXICON Imper3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep3;
                      Nrep5;
LEXICON Imper4
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrep3;
                      Nrep4;

LEXICON Nrep3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper3;
                      NImper5;
LEXICON Nrep5
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper3;
                      NImper5;

LEXICON Nrep4
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper3;
                      NImper4;

LEXICON NImper3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot3;
                      Pot5;
LEXICON NImper5
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot3;
                      Pot5;

LEXICON NImper4
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Pot3;
                      Pot4;

LEXICON Pot3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf3;
             Case3;
LEXICON Pot5
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf3;
             Case3;

LEXICON Pot4
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf3;
             Case4; ! case4 if differs
LEXICON AddInf3
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
                Case3;

LEXICON Verb
aránylik:arányol AddVerb3;
bicsaklik:bicsakol AddVerb3;
bomlik:bomol AddVerb3;
csillámlik:csillámol AddVerb3;
csuklik:csukol AddVerb3;
csuszamlik:csuszamol AddVerb3;
fuldoklik:fuldokol AddVerb3;
gyülemlik:gyülemel AddVerb3;
gyüremlik:gyüremel AddVerb3;
hajlik:hajol AddVerb3;
haldoklik:haldokol AddVerb3;
hámlik:hámol AddVerb3;
háramlik:háramol AddVerb3;
iramlik:iramol AddVerb3;
morajlik:morajol AddVerb3;
nyaklik:nyakol AddVerb3;
omlik:omol AddVerb3;
piroslik:pirosol AddVerb3;
robajlik:robajol AddVerb3;
romlik:romol AddVerb3;
sikamlik:sikamol AddVerb3;
szólamlik:szólamol AddVerb3;
toronylik:toronyol AddVerb3;
ugrik:ugor AddVerb3;
vereslik:veresel AddVerb3;
viszonylik:viszonyul AddVerb3;
zajlik:zajol AddVerb3;
áramlik:áramol AddVerb3;
